Arkansas, session 2025, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Family Planning Only Program.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall establish a Family Planning
Only Program to provide only family planning services to individuals
described in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) An individual is eligible for enrollment in the Family Planning
Only Program if he or she:
(1) Is not eligible for any other category in the Arkansas
Medicaid Program; and
(2) Has an income not exceeding two hundred percent (200%) of
the federal poverty level, as in effect January 1, 2025.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.
*JMB066*
01-16-2025 13:31:34 JMB066

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1012

/s/A. Collins


































01-16-2025 13:31:34 JMB066